Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-511
Museum; conveyance of real estate or other property; procedure; applicability of section.

The museum board may, by resolution of the majority of the board, direct the sale, conveyance, or disposition of any real estate or other property owned by the museum board or by the museum upon such terms and conditions as the museum board deems in the best interest of the museum, except that the provisions of this section shall not include any items or property subject to the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act or the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act, 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq. The museum board shall properly document the sale, conveyance, or disposition of any real estate or other property, including a brief description of the real estate or other property, the disposition made, the name of the recipient of the real estate or other property, the amount tendered or a description and stated value of real estate or other property received in exchange, and the date of the transaction. All funds derived from such sales shall be deposited in the museum fund and kept for use by the museum separate and apart from other funds of the city, village, county, or township as authorized by section 51-507.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 11, p. 770;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 750, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 59, § 5.

Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act, see section 12-1201.